Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB304.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-NMILITARY EDUCATION SCHOLARSHIP ACCOUNTSection 2001-N. Scope of article.This article relates to military education scholarship accounts.Section 2002-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920 "Applicant." A parent who applies for a military education scholarship account under section 2003-N(b) on behalf of an eligible student."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible student." A school-age child who meets the requirements under section 2003-N(b) and whose parent has entered into an agreement under section 2003-N(d)."Institution of higher education." As defined under section 118(c)."Military education scholarship account." A spending account established and administered by the State Treasury, and controlled by a parent, for a school-age child with money that may be spent on a qualified education expense as provided for under section 2005-N."Nonpublic school." A school, other than a public school, located in this Commonwealth where a Commonwealth resident may legally fulfill the compulsory attendance requirements of this act, that complies with section 1521 and meets the applicable requirements of 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21 Subch. V (relating to federally assisted programs)."Parent." An individual who:(1) is a resident of this Commonwealth; and(2) either:(i) has legal custody or guardianship of a student; or(ii) keeps in the individual's home a student and supports the student gratis as if the student were a lineal descendant of the individual."Participating entity."20250SB0304PN0238 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Any of the following where a school-age child receives instruction under section 2003-N(d):(i) A nonpublic school for kindergarten through grade 12, or a combination of grades.(ii) An institution of higher education.(iii) A distance learning program that is not offered by a public school or the department.(iv) A tutor who is a teacher licensed in any state, has taught at an eligible postsecondary institution and is a subject matter expert or a tutor or tutoring agency otherwise approved by the department.(2) The term does not include a parent of a school-age child to the extent that the parent provides educational services directly to the school-age child."Program." The Military Education Scholarship Account Program established under section 2003-N(a)."Public school." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Resident school district." The school district in which a school-age child resides."School-age child." A child enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12 and who resides in this Commonwealth."Student with a disability." A school-age child who has been identified, in accordance with 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14 (relating to special education services and programs), as a "child with a disability," as defined in 34 CFR 300.8(a) (relating to child with a disability).Section 2003-N. Establishment, application and agreement.(a) Establishment.--The Military Education Scholarship 20250SB0304PN0238 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Account Program is established as a program of the department.(b) Individuals who may apply.--A parent may apply for a military education scholarship account for a school-age child who:(1) is a child of a parent who is on full-time active-duty status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and reserve on active duty orders under 10 U.S.C. §§ 12301 (relating to reserve components generally) and 12401 et seq. (relating to Army and Air National Guard of the United States: status) or was killed in the line of duty; or(2) participated in the program in the prior year and is renewing an agreement under subsection (i) by filing an application with the department, in a manner and on a form provided by the department.(c) Application form.--The form may not exceed one page that measures 8.5 inches by 11 inches and may be filled out and submitted through the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Review and approval.--The department shall review the application to determine if the applicant meets the requirements under subsection (b). If the requirements have been met, the department shall approve the application and enter into an agreement with the applicant. The agreement shall provide that:(1) The school-age child withdraw from public school and receive instruction in this Commonwealth from a participating entity for the school year for which the agreement applies.(2) The school-age child not accept a scholarship in the educational improvement tax credit program under Article XX-B or the opportunity scholarship tax credit program under 20250SB0304PN0238 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Article XX-B.(3) The parent will receive a grant on behalf of the school-age child, in the form of money deposited under section 2004-N in the military education scholarship account.(4) The money in the military education scholarship account may be expended only as authorized under this article.(e) Military education scholarship account.--(1) If an agreement is entered into under subsection (d), a military education scholarship account shall be established. The military education scholarship account shall be administered by the State Treasury under this article.(2) Failure of a parent to enter into an agreement under subsection (d) for a school year shall not preclude the parent from entering into an agreement for a subsequent school year if the school-age child is eligible under subsection (b).(f) Term of agreement.--An agreement entered into under subsection (d) shall be valid for one school year.(g) Termination.--(1) Notwithstanding subsection (h), an agreement entered into under subsection (d) may be terminated early.(2) If an agreement is terminated early by either the parent or the department, all available money in the military education scholarship account shall revert to the State Treasury and be used in the resident school district.(h) Automatic termination.--(1) An agreement entered into under subsection (d) shall terminate automatically if the school-age child no longer resides in this Commonwealth.20250SB0304PN0238 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The parent shall notify the department if the child no longer resides in this Commonwealth within 15 days of the change of residence. After the child's parent has notified the department, money remaining in the military education scholarship account shall revert to the State Treasury and be used in the resident school district.(i) Renewal.--(1) Subject to subsection (l), an agreement entered into under subsection (d) may be renewed for each school year for the school-age child.(2) Failure of a parent to renew an agreement for a school year shall not preclude a parent from renewing the agreement for a subsequent school year if the school-age child remains eligible under subsection (b).(j) Number.--A parent may enter into separate agreements under subsection (d) for each school-age child of the parent. Not more than one military education scholarship account may be established for a school-age child.(k) Explanation.--Upon entering into an agreement under subsection (d) or renewing an agreement under subsection (i), the department shall provide the parent with a written explanation of the authorized uses of the money in the military education scholarship account and the responsibilities of the parent, the department and the State Treasury under the agreement and this article.(l) Application and renewal period.--(1) A parent may apply or seek renewal between January 1 and April 1 for the following school year.(2) The department shall notify parents and school districts of approved applications by April 30.20250SB0304PN0238 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2004-N. Amount.(a) Grant.--If a parent of an eligible student enters into or renews an agreement under section 2003-N with the department for a school year, the Secretary of Education shall deposit a grant for that school year in the military education scholarship account of the eligible student. The amount of the grant shall be as follows:(1) For an eligible student who does not have a disability, the grant amount shall be equal to the State revenue received by school districts minus the State revenue received for transportation divided by the State total average daily membership.(2) For an eligible student with a disability, the grant amount shall be based on the category of disability by which the resident school district is required to categorize the eligible student with a disability for the purpose of the report required under section 1372(8) as follows:(i) For an eligible student in Category 1, multiply the grant amount in paragraph (1) by 1.51.(ii) For an eligible student in Category 2, multiply the grant amount in paragraph (1) by 3.77.(iii) For an eligible student in Category 3A and 3B, multiply the grant amount in paragraph (1) by 7.46.(3) For an eligible student receiving a grant, the amount of basic education funding and other subsidies paid by the department to the resident school district shall be reduced by the grant amount calculated for the student.(4) If a school district's basic education funding and other subsidies are reduced under this section, the resident school district shall include the grant recipient in the 20250SB0304PN0238 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resident school district's average daily membership for the purpose of calculating school subsidies.(b) Installments.--The State Treasury shall deposit the money for each grant in quarterly installments under a schedule determined by the State Treasury.(c) Disposition.--The following shall apply to money remaining in a military education scholarship account:(1) For money remaining in a military education scholarship account at the end of a school year, the money may be carried forward to any other school year of the eligible student if the agreement entered into under section 2003-N(d) is renewed for the other school year.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), money remaining in a military education scholarship account when an agreement entered into under section 2003-N(d) is not renewed or is terminated shall revert to the resident school district.(3) Money remaining in a military education scholarship account after the school-age child graduates from high school may be used for qualified education expenses under section 2005-N for up to two years after the date of high school graduation. After the two-year time period under this paragraph has expired, money remaining in the military education scholarship account shall revert to the General Fund.Section 2005-N. Qualified education expenses.(a) Use.--Money deposited into a military education scholarship account may be used to pay for any of the following expenses incurred by or associated with the school-age child:(1) Tuition and fees charged by a participating entity.(2) Textbooks or uniforms required by a participating 20250SB0304PN0238 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity.(3) Fees for tutoring or other teaching services provided by a participating entity.(4) Fees for a nationally norm-referenced test, advanced placement or similar examination or standardized examination required for admission to an institution of higher education, and career and technical education examination fees.(5) Fees for purchasing a curriculum or instructional materials required to administer the curriculum.(6) If the eligible student is a student with a disability, fees for special instruction or special services provided to the eligible student, including occupational, physical, speech and behavioral therapies.(7) Other valid educational expenses approved by the department.(b) Prohibitions.--A participating entity that receives a payment for qualified education expenses authorized under subsection (a) may not:(1) Refund a portion of the payment directly to the parent who made the payment.(2) Rebate or otherwise directly share a portion of the payment with the parent who made the payment.(c) Refund.--A participating entity shall deposit a refund for an item that is being returned or an item or service that has not been provided directly to the military education scholarship account of the school-age child from which payment for the item or service was made.(d) Payment system.--(1) The State Treasury shall develop a system that enables a parent to pay for services provided by 20250SB0304PN0238 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participating entities under the program by electronic money transfer, including electronic payment systems or other means of electronic payment that the State Treasury determines to be commercially viable and cost effective.(2) The State Treasury may not adopt a system that requires a parent to be reimbursed for out-of-pocket expenses.(e) Source of payment.--(1) An individual may not deposit personal money into or otherwise make gifts or contributions of private money to a military education scholarship account.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a parent or school-age child from paying for qualified education expenses from a source other than the military education scholarship account.Section 2006-N. Audits and penalties.(a) Audit.--The Attorney General shall conduct audits of a military education scholarship account as the State Treasurer determines necessary.(b) Penalties.--If the State Treasury determines that money in a military education scholarship account has been expended for an expense other than a qualified education expense under section 2005-N(a), the State Treasury may do any of the following:(1) Freeze or dissolve the military education scholarship account, in accordance with regulations adopted by the State Treasury for notice of the action and opportunity to respond to the notice.(2) Refer the matter to the Attorney General or district attorney of the county in which the parent resides for 20250SB0304PN0238 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation and criminal prosecution, if appropriate.(3) Impose a civil penalty equal to 300% of the amount in the military education scholarship account prior to the fraudulent use.(4) Disqualify the parent from future participation in the program.Section 2007-N. Accountability standards for a participating entity.(a) Compliance.--A participating entity shall:(1) Comply with all health and safety laws or codes that apply to the participating entity.(2) Hold a valid occupancy permit if required by the municipality in which the participating entity is located.(3) Comply with the nondiscrimination policies set forth in section 42 U.S.C. § 1981 (relating to equal rights under the law) and with section 1521.(4) Comply with sections 111 and 111.1.(b) Financial accountability standards.--A participating entity shall:(1) Provide parents with a receipt for all qualifying expenses incurred by the participating entity.(2) File with the department prior to the start of the school year financial viability documentation which demonstrates the participating entity's ability to repay $50,000 or more from the military education scholarship accounts during the school year. The financial viability documentation shall include:(i) a surety bond payable to the Commonwealth in an amount equal to the aggregate amount of money from the military education scholarship accounts expected to be 20250SB0304PN0238 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paid during the school year on behalf of eligible students admitted at the participating entity; or(ii) financial information that demonstrates that the participating entity has the ability to pay an aggregate amount equal to the amount of money from the military educational scholarship accounts expected to be paid during the school year on behalf of eligible students admitted to the participating entity.(c) Academic accountability standards.--(1) A parent of an eligible student shall ensure that the department is informed of the eligible student's graduation from high school.(2) The department shall:(i) Ensure compliance with all student privacy laws, including 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights).(ii) Administer an annual parental satisfaction survey that shall ask parents of eligible students participating in the program to express:(A) The parents' satisfaction with the program. (B) The number of years the eligible student has participated in the program.(C) The parents' opinions on other topics, items or issues that the department determines would elicit information about the effectiveness of the program.(d) Participating entity autonomy.--(1) A participating entity shall be autonomous and may not be an agent of the department or the Commonwealth.(2) The department or any other State agency may not regulate the educational program of a participating entity 20250SB0304PN0238 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that accepts money from a military education scholarship account.(3) The establishment of the program may not be construed to expand the regulatory authority of the State, the officers of the State or any school district to impose any additional regulation of a participating entity beyond those necessary to enforce the requirements of the program.Section 2008-N. Bar of certain participating entities.(a) Bar from participation.--The department may bar a participating entity from participation in the program if the department establishes that the participating entity has:(1) routinely failed to comply with the accountability standards established in section 2007-N; or(2) failed to provide an eligible student with the educational services funded by the eligible student's military education scholarship account.(b) Notice.--If the department bars a participating entity from participation in the program, the department shall post the decision on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. A participating entity may appeal the department's decision under this section.Section 2009-N. Duties of resident school districts.(a) School records.--A resident school district shall provide a participating entity that has admitted an eligible student participating in the program with a complete copy of the student's school records immediately upon the student's enrollment or when services in the participating entity begin, subject to 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights).(b) Transportation.--A resident school district shall 20250SB0304PN0238 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide transportation for an eligible student to and from the participating entity under the same conditions as the resident school district provides transportation of other resident students to nonpublic schools under section 1361. The resident school district shall qualify for State transportation reimbursement for each eligible student transported.Section 2010-N. Legal proceedings.(a) Liability.--No liability shall arise on the part of the agency, the Commonwealth or a public school or school district based on the award or use of a military education scholarship account under this article.(b) Challenges.--If any part of this article is challenged in a State court as violating either the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Pennsylvania, parents of eligible students and students who previously had a military education scholarship account shall be permitted to intervene as of right in the lawsuit for the purposes of defending the military education scholarship account program's constitutionality. For the purposes of judicial administration, a court may require that all parents file a joint brief but may not require all parents to join a brief filed on behalf of a named State defendant.(c) Severability.--If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are declared to be severable.Section 2011-N. Listing of participating entities.The department shall annually post on the department's 20250SB0304PN0238 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet website a listing of all participating entities.Section 2012-N. Regulations.The State Treasury and the department shall jointly develop guidelines as necessary for the administration of this article within 60 days of the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0304PN0238 - 15 - 1234567